Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 61. Offenses Against Public Order.

Cross references. —

For increase in classification of misdemeanors committed in connection with a criminal street gang, see AS

12.55.137

.

For provisions on insanity and competency to stand trial, see AS 12.47.

For provisions relating to punishment, see AS

12.55.125

for imprisonment for felonies, AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment for misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For restitution, see AS

12.55.045

.